Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE A. HUNTING AND FISHING LICENSES

CHAPTER 47. COMMERCIAL FISHING LICENSES

SUBCHAPTER A. LICENSES

Sec. 47.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commercial fisherman" means a person who for pay or for the purpose of sale, barter, or exchange or any other commercial purpose:

(A) catches aquatic products from the water of this state except finfish from the tidal waters of this state; or

(B) unloads in this state aquatic products that:

(i) were taken from water outside this state; and

(ii) have not been previously unloaded in another state or a foreign country.

(2) "Commercial finfish fisherman" means a person who catches finfish from the tidal waters of this state for pay or for the purpose of sale, barter, exchange, or any other commercial purpose. The term does not include a person who:

(A) holds an individual bait dealer's license issued under this chapter;

(B) is in a vessel licensed under this chapter as a menhaden boat and who takes menhaden; or

(C) takes minnows for bait only.

(3) "Wholesale fish dealer" means a person who operates a place of business for selling, offering for sale, canning, preserving, processing, or handling for shipments or sale aquatic products to retail fish dealers, hotels, restaurants, cafes, consumers, or other wholesale fish dealers. The term does not include the holder of a bait-shrimp dealer's license.

(4) "Retail fish dealer" means a person who operates a place of business for selling or offering for sale to a consumer aquatic products, other than aquatic products that are sold by restaurants for and ready for immediate consumption in individual portion servings and that are subject to the limited sales or use tax. For purposes of this subsection, "consumer" does not include a wholesale fish dealer or a hotel, restaurant, cafe, or other retail fish dealer.

(5) "Bait dealer" means a person who catches and sells minnows, fish, shrimp, or other aquatic products for bait or a place of business where minnows, fish, shrimp, or other aquatic products are sold, offered for sale, handled, or transported for sale for bait.

(6) "Fishing guide" means a person who, for compensation, accompanies, assists, or transports a person or persons engaged in fishing in the water of this state.

(7) "Tidal water" means all the salt water of this state, including that portion of the state's territorial water in the Gulf of Mexico within three marine leagues from shore.

(8) "Nontidal water" means all the water of this state excluding tidal water.

(9) "Place of business" means a permanent structure on land or a motor vehicle required to be registered under Section 502.040, Transportation Code, where aquatic products or orders for aquatic products are received or where aquatic products are sold or purchased but does not include a boat or any type of floating device, a public cold storage vault, the portion of a structure that is used as a residence, or a vehicle from which no orders are taken or no shipments or deliveries are made other than to the place of business of a licensee in this state.

(10) "Menhaden fish plant" means a fixed installation on land designed, equipped, and used to process fish and the by-products of fish by the application of pressure, heat, or chemicals or a combination of pressure, heat, and chemicals to raw fish to convert the raw fish into fish oil, fish solubles, fish scraps, or other products.

(11) "Red drum" means the species Sciaenops ocellata, commonly called "redfish."

(12) "Resident" means an individual who has resided continuously in this state for more than six months immediately before applying for a license required by this chapter from the department.

(13) "Nonresident" means an individual who is not a resident.

(14) "Finfish" means those living natural resources having either cartilaginous or bony skeletons (Chondrichthyes and Osteichthyes).

(15) "Permanent structure" means a building designed, planned, and constructed so as to remain at one location.

(16) "Aquatic product" means any live or dead, uncooked, fresh or frozen aquatic animal life.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 214, ch. 105, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1977; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 720, ch. 270, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 550, ch. 260, art. 4, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1398, ch. 623, Sec. 5, 6, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 924, ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 1981; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 29, Sec. 1, 2, eff. April 22, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 255, Sec. 14, eff. July 31, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 5, 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.233, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 859, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 15.001, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 47.002. GENERAL COMMERCIAL FISHERMAN'S LICENSE. (a) No person may engage in business as a commercial fisherman unless he has obtained a general commercial fisherman's license.

(b) The license fee for a general commercial fisherman's license is $15 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) The license fee for a nonresident general commercial fisherman's license is $100 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. A nonresident who is residing in a state that denies the privilege of commercial fishing in that state to a Texas resident because of residency status is not eligible for a nonresident general commercial fisherman's license.

(d) A person who is in a vessel licensed under this chapter as a menhaden boat and who takes menhaden is not required to obtain or possess a general commercial fisherman's license.

(e) A person who catches or assists in catching shrimp on a vessel licensed as a commercial shrimp boat under Chapter 77 is not required to obtain or possess a general commercial fisherman's license. The exemption provided by this section applies even though aquatic life other than shrimp are caught if that catching is incidental to lawful shrimping.

(f) A person who takes or assists in taking oysters on a vessel licensed as a commercial oyster boat under Chapter 76 is required to obtain or possess a general commercial fisherman's license. This subsection does not apply to the holder of a commercial oyster boat captain's license.

(g) A person who is licensed as a bait dealer under this chapter is not required to obtain or possess a general commercial fisherman's license if the person is catching bait only.

(h) A person who engages in or assists in commercial crab fishing under Subchapter B, Chapter 78, and who holds a license for that activity is not required to obtain or possess a general commercial fisherman's license or a commercial fishing boat license.

(i) A person who engages in commercial finfish fishing under Subchapter D and who holds a commercial finfish fisherman's license issued under Subchapter D in their immediate possession is not required to obtain or possess a general commercial fisherman's license.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1398, ch. 623, Sec. 7, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2542, ch. 676, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1332, ch. 277, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 128, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 604 (H.B. 3497), Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2023.

Sec. 47.004. RESIDENT FISHING GUIDE LICENSE. (a) No resident may engage in business as a fishing guide unless the resident has obtained a resident fishing guide license.

(b) The commission may adopt rules governing the issuance and use of a resident fishing guide license, including rules creating separate resident fishing guide licenses for use in saltwater and freshwater.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1333, ch. 277, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 38, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 56, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 859, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 47.005. NONRESIDENT FISHING GUIDE LICENSE. (a) No nonresident may engage in business as a fishing guide unless the nonresident has obtained a nonresident fishing guide license.

(b) The commission may adopt rules governing the issuance and use of a nonresident fishing guide license, including rules creating separate nonresident fishing guide licenses for use in saltwater and freshwater.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 859, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 47.006. LICENSE FEE. The license fee for resident, nonresident, freshwater, and saltwater guides is $75 or an amount for each guide type set separately by the commission, whichever amount is more.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 859, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 47.007. COMMERCIAL FISHING BOAT LICENSE. (a) No person may use a vessel required to be numbered or registered under the laws of this state or the United States for the purpose of catching or assisting in catching aquatic products except shrimp, oysters, or menhaden, from the waters of this state, or have on board a vessel, or unload, or allow to be unloaded at a port or point in this state, edible aquatic products caught or taken from salt water outside the state without having been previously unloaded in some other state or foreign country, for pay or for the purpose of sale, barter, exchange, or any other commercial purpose unless the vessel is licensed as a commercial fishing boat and has a commercial fishing boat number affixed to it.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (e) of this section, the fee for a commercial fishing boat license and number is $10.50 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) The commission shall provide by rule for the issuance and use of commercial fishing boat numbers. Each boat required to be licensed by this section shall have the number affixed to the bow of the boat or to such other location on the boat as will be readily accessible for unimpaired visual inspection of the number by a person on another boat. In such instances where the number will not properly affix to a wooden boat, the commission shall provide for an alternate means of identification of such boat. Unless provided otherwise herein or by the rules of the commission, a license issued under this section is not valid unless the number is affixed to the boat as required by this section and the rules of the commission.

(d) An applicant for a commercial fishing boat license, which is not a renewal of the previous year's license, must submit to the department the vessel's United States Coast Guard Certificate of Documentation or Texas' or other state's Certificate of Number for a vessel or motorboat. The license issued by the department must contain:

(1) the name of the boat if the boat is registered with the United States Coast Guard; and

(2) the number appearing on the United States Coast Guard Certificate of Documentation or Texas' or other state's Certificate of Number.

(e) The fee for a commercial fishing boat license for a boat that is not numbered under Chapter 31 of this code or does not have a certificate of documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard that lists an address in Texas for the boat owner or other criteria established by the commission is $60 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(f) A person who engages in commercial finfish fishing under Subchapter D and who holds a commercial finfish fisherman's license issued under Subchapter D in their immediate possession is not required to obtain or possess a commercial fishing boat license.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 377, ch. 153, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1333, ch. 277, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 4055, ch. 634, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 255, Sec. 15, eff. July 31, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 8, 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 450, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 60, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.008. MENHADEN BOAT LICENSES.

(a) A boat may not be used for the purpose of catching, storing, and transporting menhaden in tidal water unless the owner of the boat has acquired:

(1) a Class A menhaden boat license; or

(2) a Class C menhaden boat license.

(a-1) The holder of a Class C menhaden boat license may not take or harvest from the public water of the state more than 300 pounds a day of menhaden or an amount set by the department.

(b) A boat may not be used for the purpose of assisting in catching menhaden in tidal water unless the owner of the boat has acquired a Class B menhaden boat license.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1111 (H.B. 2218), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

(d) The commission shall set the license fee for each menhaden boat for each yearly period:

(1) in an amount not less than $2,000 for a Class A menhaden boat license;

(2) in an amount not to exceed $50 for a Class B menhaden boat license; and

(3) at $420 for a Class C menhaden boat license.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2542, ch. 676, art. 1, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 27, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1111 (H.B. 2218), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1111 (H.B. 2218), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 47.009. WHOLESALE FISH DEALER'S LICENSE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c) of this section, no person may engage in business as a wholesale fish dealer unless he has obtained a wholesale fish dealer's license.

(b) The license fee for a wholesale fish dealer's license is $400 for each place of business or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) An operator of a Texas commercial aquaculture facility as defined by Section 134.001, Agriculture Code, is not required to obtain or possess a wholesale fish dealer's license if the operator's business activities with regard to the sale of aquatic products involve aquatic products raised on the operator's commercial aquaculture facility only.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1334, ch. 277, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 42, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 491, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 57, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 45, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.0091. PURCHASE OF AQUATIC PRODUCTS BY WHOLESALE FISH DEALERS. No wholesale fish dealer may purchase for resale or receive for sale, barter, exchange, or any other commercial purpose any aquatic product from any person or entity in this state unless the dealer purchases the product from the operator of a commercial aquaculture facility as defined by Section 134.001, Agriculture Code, or the holder of:

(1) a general commercial fisherman's license;

(2) a commercial oyster fisherman's license;

(3) a commercial oyster boat license;

(4) a wholesale fish dealer's license;

(5) a commercial shrimp boat license;

(6) a commercial oyster boat captain's license;

(7) a commercial shrimp boat captain's license;

(8) a commercial crab fisherman's license;

(9) a commercial finfish fisherman's license;

(10) a commercial gulf shrimp unloading license; or

(11) a cultivated oyster mariculture permit.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2384, ch. 595, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 827, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 255, Sec. 16, eff. July 31, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1151 (H.B. 1260), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 174 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 46, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.010. WHOLESALE TRUCK DEALER'S FISH LICENSE. (a) The license fee for a wholesale truck dealer's fish license is $250 for each truck or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(b) A resident who operates a vehicle used to transport cultured species from a private facility, as those terms are defined by Section 134.001, Agriculture Code, and sells cultured species from the vehicle is not required to obtain a license for the vehicle under this section if the vehicle is used with regard to the sale or transportation of only aquatic products raised on a Texas commercial aquaculture facility belonging to the operator of the vehicle.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1334, ch. 277, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 43, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 47, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.011. RETAIL FISH DEALER'S LICENSE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c) of this section, no person may engage in business as a retail fish dealer unless he has obtained a retail fish dealer's license.

(b) The license fee for a retail fish dealer's license is $30 for each place of business or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) An operator of a Texas commercial aquaculture facility as defined by Section 134.001, Agriculture Code, is not required to obtain or possess a retail fish dealer's license if the operator's business activities with regard to the sale of aquatic products involve aquatic products raised on the operator's commercial aquaculture facility only.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1334, ch. 277, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 491, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 59, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 48, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.0111. PURCHASE OF AQUATIC PRODUCTS BY RETAIL FISH DEALERS. No retail fish dealer may purchase for resale or receive for sale, barter, exchange, or any other commercial purposes any aquatic products from any person or entity in this state unless the dealer purchases the product from the operator of a commercial aquaculture facility as defined by Section 134.001, Agriculture Code, or the holder of:

(1) a wholesale fish dealer's license; or

(2) a general commercial fisherman's license, a commercial shrimp boat license, a commercial shrimp boat captain's license, a commercial gulf shrimp unloading license, a commercial crab fisherman's license, or a commercial finfish fisherman's license when the retail fish dealer has given written notification to the director or the director's designee of the dealer's intent to purchase aquatic products from the holder of a general commercial fisherman's license, a commercial shrimp boat license, a commercial shrimp boat captain's license, a commercial crab fisherman's license, or a commercial finfish fisherman's license.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2384, ch. 595, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 827, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 491, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1151 (H.B. 1260), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 49, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.012. PURCHASE OF AQUATIC PRODUCTS BY RESTAURANT OWNER, OPERATOR, OR EMPLOYEE. No restaurant owner, operator, or employee may purchase for consumption by the restaurant's patrons on the restaurant's premises any aquatic product from any person or entity in this state unless the person purchases the aquatic product from the operator of a commercial aquaculture facility as defined by Section 134.001, Agriculture Code, or the holder of:

(1) a wholesale fish dealer's license;

(2) a general commercial fisherman's license;

(3) a commercial shrimp boat license;

(4) a commercial shrimp boat captain's license;

(5) a commercial crab fisherman's license;

(6) a commercial finfish fisherman's license; or

(7) a commercial gulf shrimp unloading license.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 827, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 26, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 491, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1151 (H.B. 1260), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 50, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.0121. UNLAWFUL COMMERCIAL SALE OR PURCHASE OF AQUATIC PRODUCTS. (a) A person commits an offense if the person purchases for resale or receives for sale, barter, exchange, transport, or any other commercial purpose aquatic products that are taken, possessed, transported, or sold in violation of a federal or state law or regulation.

(b) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that the person:

(1) had no reason to believe at the time the offense was committed that the aquatic products purchased for resale or received for sale, barter, exchange, transport, or any other commercial purpose were taken, possessed, transported, or sold in violation of a federal or state law or regulation; and

(2) purchased or received the aquatic products described by Subdivision (1) from a seller who had a valid commercial license to sell aquatic products.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 1828), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 47.013. RETAIL DEALER'S TRUCK LICENSE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c) of this section, a person may engage in the business of selling edible aquatic products from a motor vehicle to consumers only if he obtains a retail dealer's truck license.

(b) The license fee for a retail dealer's truck license is $50 for each truck or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) A resident who operates a vehicle used to transport cultured species from a private facility, as those terms are defined by Section 134.001, Agriculture Code, and sells cultured species from the vehicle is not required to obtain a license for the vehicle under this section when the vehicle is used with regard to the sale or transportation of only aquatic products raised on a Texas commercial aquaculture facility belonging to the operator of the vehicle.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1334, ch. 277, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 45, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 491, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 60, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 51, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.014. BAIT DEALER'S LICENSE. (a) No person may engage in business as a bait dealer unless the person has obtained the appropriate bait dealer's license.

(b) The license fee for a bait dealer's license is $20 for each place of business or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) An operator of a Texas commercial aquaculture facility as defined by Section 134.001, Agriculture Code, is not required to obtain or possess a bait dealer's license if the operator's business activities with regard to the sale of aquatic products for bait involve only aquatic products raised on the operator's commercial aquaculture facility.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 214, ch. 105, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1977; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1335, ch. 277, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 61, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 52, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 47.016. MENHADEN FISH PLANT LICENSE. (a) No person may operate a menhaden fish plant unless he has obtained a menhaden fish plant license.

(b) Applications for a menhaden fish plant license must be submitted on forms prescribed by the department and accompanied by a filing fee. The filing fee is $100 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. The filing fee shall be accompanied by a certified copy of an order of the commissioners court of the county in which the plant will be located containing:

(1) a description of the plant and its location; and

(2) approval of the court for the construction and operation of the plant.

(c) Decisions of the commissioners court in approving or disapproving the construction of a plant are final and may not be reviewed or appealed.

(d) A menhaden fish plant license shall be issued after a hearing and a finding by the department that the construction and operation of the plant is in the public interest. Regardless of the decision of the department, the filing fee is not refundable.

(e) Notice of the hearing must be given at least 20 days prior to the date set for the hearing to the county judge of the county in which the plant is to be constructed and to all known interested parties.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1335, ch. 277, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 47.017. RENEWAL OF FISH PLANT LICENSE. The department shall renew a menhaden fish plant license on the application of the licensee and on the payment of a renewal fee of $50 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 47.018. INTERSTATE TRANSPORTATION. (a) No person may bring into this state and deliver aquatic products for commercial purposes unless the person has obtained a wholesale fish dealer's license, a retail fish dealer's license, or a bait dealer's license, as applicable, issued under this subchapter.

(b) Aquatic products lawfully taken from the waters of another state may be sold within this state by licensed dealers without regard to size limitations imposed on such products taken within this state. A record of the source and disposition of such undersize or oversize products shall be maintained by the dealer for as long as the undersize or oversize products are retained and for at least 30 days thereafter.

(c) No person may transport aquatic products out of this state for commercial purposes unless the transporter first obtains a wholesale fish dealer's license or a retail fish dealer's license.

(d) A person who delivers aquatic products for a licensed wholesale fish dealer or retail fish dealer must possess a copy of the dealer's license while making deliveries.

(e) Repealed by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1399, ch. 623, Sec. 10, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 47.0181. AQUATIC PRODUCT TRANSPORTATION INVOICES. (a) No person, except a commercial fisherman licensed to take aquatic products from Texas waters transporting the fisherman's own catch within this state, may transport aquatic products for commercial purposes, regardless of origin or destination, without an invoice containing the following information correctly stated and legibly written:

(1) the invoice number;

(2) the date of shipment;

(3) the name and physical address of shipper;

(4) the name and physical address of receiver;

(5) the license number of shipper; and

(6) the quantity of aquatic products contained in the shipment; finfish by species and by number or weight, oysters by volume, and all other aquatic products by weight.

(b) Aquatic product transportation invoices must be prepared by the shipper and copies retained on file by both shipper and receiver for at least one year from the date of shipment. The shipper shall sequentially number the invoices during each license period. No invoice number may be used twice during any one license period by an individual licensee.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 63, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 47.0182. AQUATIC PRODUCT SHIPPING REQUIREMENTS. (a) Each container of aquatic products shipped for commercial purposes must have a label attached to the outside listing the following information correctly stated and legibly written:

(1) the aquatic product transportation invoice number of the shipment of which the container is a part; and

(2) the kind and weight of aquatic product.

(b) No person may ship finfish in individual packages that contain more than one species of aquatic life.

(c) A person possessing a shipment of aquatic products in violation of Subsection (a) or (b) of this section commits an offense.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 47.0183. TRANSPORTATION OF AQUATIC PRODUCTS; DISPLAY OF DOCUMENTS. (a) A person transporting aquatic products for commercial purposes commits an offense if:

(1) the person does not possess the license or a copy of the license authorizing the commercial transportation;

(2) the person does not keep with the aquatic product any document, including a tag, invoice, or bill of lading, that is required by this code or a regulation of the commission for transporting aquatic products; or

(3) the person does not, on the request of a game warden, present to the game warden without delay a license, copy of a license, or document required by this code or a regulation of the commission for transporting aquatic products.

(b) A culpable mental state is not required to establish an offense under this section.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 47.019. EXCLUSIVE ECONOMIC ZONE. (a) Any vessel operating in the exclusive economic zone that lands fish, shrimp, crabs, or other aquatic organisms in this state is required to be licensed and registered as provided by Chapters 47 and 77 of this code.

(b) The commission may adopt regulations for vessels in the exclusive economic zone that land fish, shrimp, crabs, or other aquatic organisms in this state.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 217, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO COMMERCIAL FISHING LICENSES

Sec. 47.031. EXPIRATION OF LICENSES. (a) All licenses and permits issued under the authority of Chapter 47 of this code are valid only during the yearly period for which they are issued without regard to the date on which the licenses are acquired. Each yearly period begins on September 1 or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a license fee for a license issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this chapter and provide for a license term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than a year.

(b) All licenses and permits issued under the authority of Chapter 47 may not be transferred to another person except that a license issued in the name of a business shall remain valid for the business location specified on the license or permit if a change of ownership and/or business name occurs. A license issued under the authority of Section 47.009, 47.011, 47.014, or 47.016 may be transferred to a new address if the business moves to another location. A license issued under the authority of Section 47.007, 47.010, or 47.013 may be transferred to another vehicle or vessel or to a new owner of the same vehicle or vessel. The commission, by regulation, may prescribe requirements necessary to clarify license and permit transfer procedures and may prescribe, by regulation, forms to be used and fees to be charged for transfer of licenses and permits in this chapter and for duplicate license plates and duplicate or replacement licenses and permits.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 14, eff. May 31, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 61, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 64, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 47.032. REFUSAL OF LICENSE. No person owing the state any amount for a license or fee under a final judgment of a court may receive a license under this chapter until the indebtedness is satisfied by payment to the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 47.033. DISPLAY OF LICENSE. All licenses, except a tidal water commercial fisherman's license, commercial fishing boat license, menhaden boat license, and menhaden fish plant license, must be publicly displayed at all times in the place of business of the licensee. Licenses required for vehicles transporting aquatic products for sale must be displayed in the vehicle.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 47.034. AQUATIC PRODUCT SIZE. (a) No person engaged in business as a commercial fisherman or wholesale or retail fish dealer may possess in his place of business or on a boat or vehicle for commercial purposes aquatic products of greater or lesser length than set out in the applicable proclamations of the commission adopted under Chapter 61 or 66 of this code unless otherwise provided by this code or Chapter 134 of the Agriculture Code.

(b) This section does not prohibit a wholesale or retail fish dealer from processing and selling lawful aquatic products by cutting, filleting, wrapping, freezing, or otherwise preparing the aquatic products for market.

(c) The taking of aquatic products of greater or lesser length than set out in the applicable proclamations of the commission under Chapter 61 or 66 of this code on board a licensed commercial shrimp boat engaged in the taking of shrimp is not a violation of this section if the aquatic products of unlawful size are returned to the water from which they were taken in a manner to insure their best chance for survival.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1214, ch. 456, Sec. 13(l), eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 377, ch. 153, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 47.035. PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE. Proof of possession of any undersized or oversized fish in the place of business of any wholesale or retail fish dealer or on board any boat engaged in commercial fishing or in any commercial vehicle is prima facie evidence of possession for the purpose of sale.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 47.037. INSPECTION. (a) No person who possesses or handles aquatic products for commercial purposes may refuse to allow an authorized employee of the department to inspect the aquatic products at the dealer's or handler's place of business during normal business hours.

(b) No commercial fisherman may refuse to allow an authorized employee of the department to inspect aquatic products handled by or in the possession of the commercial fisherman while the commercial fisherman is pursuing his trade or at a reasonable hour.

(c) This section does not authorize the search of a residence without a search warrant.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 29, Sec. 3, eff. April 22, 1987.

Sec. 47.038. SEINES OR NETS FOR MENHADEN. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (a-1), nets or purse seines used for catching menhaden may not be:

(1) less than one and one-half inch stretched mesh, excluding the bag;

(2) used in any bay, river, pass, or tributary, nor within one mile of any barrier, jetty, island, or pass, nor within one-half mile offshore in the Gulf of Mexico; or

(3) used for the purpose of taking edible aquatic products for the purpose of barter, sale, or exchange.

(a-1) The holder of a Class C menhaden boat license issued under Section 47.008 may use a cast net, as defined by the commission, to catch menhaden in any coastal bay, river, or tributary landward from the shoreline of the state along the coast of the Gulf of Mexico.

(b) No person lawfully catching menhaden in the tidal water of this state may sell, barter, or exchange any edible aquatic products caught in a menhaden seine or net. Possession of edible aquatic fish in excess of five percent by volume of menhaden fish in possession is a prima facie violation of this chapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1111 (H.B. 2218), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 47.039. SEASONS. (a) The commission may adopt rules setting open and closed seasons for the noncommercial taking of redfish and speckled sea trout.

(b) No person may catch and retain a redfish or speckled sea trout during a closed season set by the commission under Subsection (a) of this section.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 110, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 377, ch. 153, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 110, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 47.040. REFUSAL TO SHOW LICENSE. A person who is engaging in any act for which a license or permit is required by this chapter and who fails or refuses upon request to show the required license or permit to a game warden, other peace officer, or officer of the court commits an offense.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 47.041. COMMERCIAL LICENSE BUYBACK SUBACCOUNT. (a) The commercial license buyback subaccount is a subaccount in the game, fish, and water safety account. The subaccount consists of money deposited to the subaccount under this section.

(b) The department shall deposit to the credit of the commercial license buyback subaccount revenue from the following sources:

(1) revenue set aside under Section 47.081(d);

(2) revenue set aside under Section 78.111(d);

(3) a fee collected under Section 77.115;

(4) $25 of each wholesale fish dealer's license issued under Section 47.009;

(5) $25 of each wholesale truck dealer's fish license issued under Section 47.010;

(6) $6 of each retail fish dealer's license issued under Section 47.011;

(7) $11 of each retail dealer's truck license issued under Section 47.013;

(8) $25 of each commercial bay shrimp boat license issued under Section 77.031;

(9) $25 of each commercial bait-shrimp boat license issued under Section 77.033;

(10) $25 of each commercial gulf shrimp boat license issued under Section 77.035;

(11) $15 of each bait-shrimp dealer's license issued under Section 77.043; and

(12) revenue from any other source authorized by law.

(c) The department may accept grants and donations of money or materials from private or public sources to be applied to the commercial license buyback subaccount.

(d) Money in the commercial license buyback subaccount may be used only to buy back a commercial license from a willing license holder.

(e) The commercial license buyback subaccount is not subject to Section 403.095, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1034 (H.B. 1724), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. PENALTIES, DISPLAY OF LICENSE, AND TRANSFER OF FUNDS

Sec. 47.051. PENALTY. Except as provided by Sections 47.052 and 47.053, a person who violates a provision of this chapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 827, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 544, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 1828), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 47.052. PENALTY. (a) A person who fails to comply with or who violates a provision of Section 47.003(a) of this code commits an offense that is a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) The department may seize boats, nets, seines, trawls, or other tackle in the possession of a person violating the sections listed in Subsection (a) of this section and hold them until after the trial of the person.

(c) Violations of the above sections may also be enjoined by the attorney general by suit filed in a district court in Travis County.

(d) If it is shown at the trial of the defendant for a violation of Section 47.008, 47.016, or 47.038 of this code that he has been convicted within five years before the trial date of a violation of the section for which he is being prosecuted, on conviction he shall be punished for a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 550, ch. 260, art. 4, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1399, ch. 623, Sec. 11, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 970, ch. 229, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 827, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 47.053. PENALTY. (a) A person who violates or fails to comply with Section 47.0121 commits an offense that is:

(1) a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor punishable by a fine of at least:

(A) $500 if the weight of the aquatic products totals 10 pounds or more but less than 50 pounds; or

(B) $1,000 if the weight of the aquatic products totals 50 pounds or more but less than 100 pounds;

(2) a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor punishable by a fine of at least:

(A) $1,500 if the weight of the aquatic products totals 100 pounds or more but less than 200 pounds; or

(B) $2,000 if the weight of the aquatic products totals 200 pounds or more but less than 300 pounds; or

(3) a Parks and Wildlife Code state jail felony for which, in addition to confinement, the person may be punished by a fine of at least:

(A) $3,000 if the weight of the aquatic products totals 300 pounds or more but less than 500 pounds; or

(B) $4,000 if the weight of the aquatic products totals 500 pounds or more.

(b) An offense under this section may be prosecuted in the county in which the aquatic products were unlawfully taken, possessed, transported, or sold or in any county through or into which the aquatic products were taken or transported.

(c) When aquatic products are obtained in violation of Section 47.0121 under one scheme or continuing course of conduct, whether from the same or several sources, the scheme or conduct may be considered as one offense and the weight of the aquatic products aggregated in determining the grade of the offense.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 1828), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 47.055. DISPOSITION OF FUNDS. Money received for licenses issued under this chapter or fines paid for violations of this chapter, less allowable deductions, shall be sent to the department by the 10th day of the month following receipt.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

SUBCHAPTER D. FINFISH LICENSE MANAGEMENT

Sec. 47.071. FINFISH LICENSE MANAGEMENT PROGRAM. To promote efficiency and economic stability in the commercial finfish industry and to conserve economically important finfish resources, the department shall implement a finfish license management program in accordance with proclamations adopted by the commission under Chapter 61 and this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.072. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "license" means a commercial license issued in accordance with a proclamation under this subchapter that authorizes a person to engage in business as a commercial finfish fisherman.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.073. FINFISH LICENSE MANAGEMENT REVIEW BOARD. (a) The license holders under this subchapter shall elect a finfish license management review board of nine members.

(b) A majority of the members of the review board may not be residents of the same county.

(c) The review board shall advise the commission and department and make recommendations concerning the administrative aspects of the finfish licensing program, including hardship appeal cases concerning eligibility, license transfer, license renewal, license suspension, and license revocation.

(d) The executive director shall adopt procedures for the operation of the review board and the election and terms of board members. The executive director shall solicit and consider recommendations regarding these procedures from persons who purchased commercial finfish fisherman's licenses after September 1, 1997, and through April 20, 1999.

(e) A member of the review board must:

(1) qualify to obtain a commercial finfish fisherman's license under this subchapter; or

(2) be a person who has knowledge of the commercial finfish industry.

(f) The review board is not subject to Chapter 2110, Government Code.

(g) A member of the review board serves without compensation or a per diem allowance.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.074. LICENSING. (a) No person may engage in business as a commercial finfish fisherman unless the person has obtained a commercial finfish fisherman's license.

(b) No person may engage in commercial finfish fishing unless:

(1) the person has in their immediate possession:

(A) a commercial finfish fisherman's license issued to the person; or

(B) a general commercial fisherman's license issued to the person, a commercial finfish fisherman's license issued to another person, and a copy of an affidavit that:

(i) authorizes the person to use commercial finfish fishing devices owned by the person to whom the commercial finfish fisherman's license was issued; and

(ii) contains the date, the original signature of the person to whom the commercial finfish fisherman's license was issued, and the commercial finfish fisherman's license number that matches the commercial finfish fisherman's license plate number on the boat, if the department requires a license plate; or

(2) the person has in their immediate possession a commercial finfish fisherman's license or a general commercial fisherman's license, and another person has in their immediate possession the documentation described by Subdivision (1).

(c) Beginning September 1, 2000, the department shall issue a commercial finfish fisherman's license only to a person who documents in a manner acceptable to the department that the person held a commercial finfish fisherman's license during the period after September 1, 1997, through April 20, 1999.

(d) A proclamation issued under this section shall establish a commercial finfish fisherman's license in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.075. LICENSE FEE. The fee for a commercial finfish fisherman's license issued under this subchapter is $300 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. All fees generated by the issuance of a license under this subchapter are to be sent to the comptroller for deposit to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account subject to Section 47.081(d).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.076. LICENSE RENEWAL. A person seeking to renew a license established by this subchapter must have held the license during the preceding license year.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.077. LIMIT ON NUMBER OF LICENSES HELD. (a) A person may not hold or directly or indirectly control more than three licenses issued under this subchapter.

(b) A license issued to a person other than an individual must designate an individual in whose name the license is issued.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.078. EXPIRATION OF LICENSE. A license required by this subchapter is valid only during the period for which it is issued without regard to the date on which the license is acquired. Each period is one year beginning on September 1 or another date set by the commission.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.079. LICENSE TRANSFER. (a) The commission by rule may set a fee for the transfer of a license. The amount of the transfer fee may not exceed the amount of the license fee.

(b) The commission shall send all license transfer fees to the comptroller for deposit to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account subject to Section 47.081(d).

(c) The commission by proclamation shall allow a license to be transferred at any time.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.080. LICENSE SUSPENSION AND REVOCATION. (a) The executive director, after notice to a license holder and the opportunity for a hearing, may suspend a commercial finfish fisherman's license if:

(1) the license holder or any other authorized operator of the licensed vessel is convicted of one or more flagrant offenses totaling three flagrant offenses involving the licensed vessel; or

(2) the license holder is convicted of theft of fishing gear or product associated with this subchapter.

(b) A suspension under this section may be for:

(1) six months, if:

(A) each of the three flagrant offenses occurred within a 24-consecutive-month period beginning not earlier than September 1, 2000; and

(B) the license holder has not previously had a license suspended under this section;

(2) 12 months, if each of the three flagrant offenses occurred within a 24-consecutive-month period and the license holder has previously had a license suspended under this section; or

(3) six months, if the license holder is convicted of theft of fishing gear or product associated with this subchapter.

(c) The executive director, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, may permanently revoke a license issued under this subchapter if:

(1) the license holder has previously had a license suspended twice under this section, and the license holder or any other authorized operator of the licensed vessel is convicted of three flagrant offenses involving the licensed vessel in a 24-consecutive-month period; or

(2) the license holder is convicted of theft of fishing gear or product associated with this subchapter, and the license holder has had a license suspended previously under this section.

(d) The same flagrant offense may not be counted for more than one suspension under this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, a flagrant offense includes:

(1) theft of trotlines or finfish, or any other fishing gear or product associated with this subchapter;

(2) exceeding daily bag and possession limits in violation of this code or of a proclamation of the commission issued under this code;

(3) exceeding trotline length limits by a length greater than 10 percent in violation of this code or of a proclamation of the commission issued under this code;

(4) selling crabs in violation of this code;

(5) exceeding the number of trotlines the holder of a commercial finfish fisherman's license may use in violation of this code or of a proclamation of the commission issued under this code; or

(6) taking, attempting to take, or possessing fish caught in public waters of this state by any device, means, or method other than as authorized under this code or by a proclamation of the commission issued under this code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.081. LICENSE BUYBACK. (a) The department may implement a license buyback program for licenses issued under this subchapter as part of the finfish license management program established by this subchapter.

(b) The commission by rule may establish criteria, using reasonable classifications, by which the department selects licenses to be purchased. The commission may delegate to the executive director, for purposes of this section only, the authority to develop the criteria through rulemaking procedures, but the commission by order must finally adopt the rules establishing the criteria. The commission or executive director must consult with the finfish license management review board concerning establishment of the criteria.

(c) The commission must retire each license purchased under the license buyback program until the commission finds that management of the finfish fishery allows reissue of those licenses through auction or lottery.

(d) The department shall set aside at least 20 percent of the fees from licenses issued and license transfers approved under this subchapter. That money shall be sent to the comptroller for deposit to the credit of the commercial license buyback subaccount in the game, fish, and water safety account.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1034 (H.B. 1724), Sec. 5(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1034 (H.B. 1724), Sec. 5(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

(g) The commission shall consider the social and economic viability of the finfish industry and input from the finfish license management review board regarding the reissue of finfish licenses through auction or lottery.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1034 (H.B. 1724), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1034 (H.B. 1724), Sec. 5(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 47.082. LINE LIMITS. (a) Not later than September 1, 2000, the commission by proclamation issued under this code shall authorize the holder of a commercial finfish fisherman's license to use up to 20 trotlines not more than 600 feet long, or another number and length of line authorized by commission proclamation, to take or attempt to take finfish.

(b) No holder of a commercial finfish fisherman's license may possess on board more than the number of lines prescribed by this code or by commission proclamation issued under this code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.083. CRAB TRAPS. (a) Not later than September 1, 2000, the commission by proclamation issued under this code shall authorize the holder of a commercial finfish fisherman's license to use up to 20 crab traps, or a number of traps authorized by commission proclamation, for use in commercial fishing for bait purposes only.

(b) This section does not authorize the taking of any product for pay or for the purpose of sale, barter, or exchange.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.084. PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION; RULES. (a) The executive director shall establish administrative procedures to carry out the requirements of this subchapter.

(b) The commission shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the program established under this subchapter.

(c) The commission shall prescribe all gear marking requirements for trotlines and crab traps under this subchapter in accordance with Chapter 66.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.085. DISPOSITION OF FUNDS. Money received for a license issued under this subchapter and fines for violations of this subchapter shall be remitted to the department by the 10th day of the month following the date of collection.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 47.086. PROCLAMATION; PROCEDURES. Subchapter D, Chapter 61, and Sections 61.054 and 61.055 apply to the adoption of proclamations under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 455, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.